Florida, session 2026, HB177.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (6) through (10) of section 27.511,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (7) through
(11), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to that
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb177 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 177 2026 Legislature
section to read:
27.511 Offices of criminal conflict and civil regional
counsel; legislative intent; qualifications; appointment;
duties.—
(6)(a) Notwithstanding ss. 27.40 and 27.5305, if an office
of criminal conflict and civil regional counsel has been
appointed to represent an indigent defendant in a case in which
the state has filed a notice of intent to seek the death penalty
and the office of criminal conflict and civil regional counsel
determines that it has a conflict of interest or that it can
otherwise no longer represent the defendant, the office of
criminal conflict and civil regional counsel must provide notice
to the court. Upon receiving such notice, the court is
authorized to appoint an office of criminal conflict and civil
regional counsel from another region specified in subsection (1)
to represent the defendant, provided that such office does not
have a conflict of interest and provided that the regional
counsel of such office concurs, at his or her sole discretion,
to accept the appointment. If an office of criminal conflict and
civil regional counsel cannot be appointed to represent a
defendant under this paragraph, the judge must appoint private
counsel.
(b)1. Subject to legislative appropriation, when an office
of criminal conflict and civil regional counsel accepts an
appointment under paragraph (a), all due process costs and
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb177 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 177 2026 Legislature
services must be paid from funds designated for such purpose and
administered by the Justice Administrative Commission.
2. To receive payment or reimbursement under subparagraph
1., the regional counsel, or his or her designee, must certify
that the due process costs and services are case related, and he
or she must also submit appropriate documentation of expenses.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
744.331, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
744.331 Procedures to determine incapacity.—
(2) ATTORNEY FOR THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED PERSON.—
(a) When a court appoints an attorney for an alleged
incapacitated person, the court must appoint the office of
criminal conflict and civil regional counsel or a private
attorney as prescribed in s. 27.511(7) s. 27.511(6). A private
attorney must be one who is included in the attorney registry
compiled pursuant to s. 27.40. Appointments of private attorneys
must be made on a rotating basis, taking into consideration
conflicts arising under this chapter.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb177 -02-er